Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 General Provisions
37-5-106. Powers of the department.

The department has the following powers:

Administer, develop or oversee programs, or any of these things including, but not limited to, state children's services agencies, except those operated by the department of mental health and substance abuse services or the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, assessment services, probation services, aftercare supervision services, child protective services and other services as required by law or as otherwise reasonably necessary for unruly, delinquent, dependent and neglected children, and their respective families, as well as children who are at imminent risk and in need of services to prevent entry into state custody, who are in state custody pending family reunification or other permanent placement, or as otherwise may be required for such children and their families pursuant to state law; provided, however, that such administration shall be consistent with and subject to licensing or approval authority of any other state agency that has responsibility for licensing or approval of any portion of program services or facilities provided by the department. Nothing herein shall preclude the service of at risk children by the department of mental health and substance abuse services who are classified as seriously emotionally disturbed and for whom that department has primary responsibility;

Provide services as required by law to children committed to its custody pursuant to this title or title 33, 34 or 39, or provide services to children who are in need of services as required or permitted by law under the Interstate Compact for Juveniles in chapter 4, part 1 of this title, the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children in chapter 4, part 2 of this title, or who are committed to the department by any order of the courts as a result of a divorce or adoption or guardianship proceeding;

License or approve and supervise child care agencies, as defined in part 5 of this chapter, that are placed within the department's jurisdiction pursuant to law;

License or approve and supervise all facilities that were previously operated by the department of youth development;

License or approve and supervise any entity that provides services consistent with this chapter and the exceptions set forth therein;

For the purposes of treatment, reunification and rehabilitation, allow delinquent children committed to the department's custody to make home visits to the natural parent(s), relatives or legal guardian. Such visits must be approved by the committing juvenile court, unless such court declines to exercise decision making in regard to home passes, in which case the commissioner has authority to grant passes without any further court approval or action;

Receive and administer state funds appropriated for children being served by the department of children's services;

Seek, apply for, receive and administer federal funds as well as any other grants or funds that can be used for children being served by the department of children's services;

Administer the contractual obligations and functions and the funding arrangements for the department;

Enter into contracts with the departments of human services, mental health and substance abuse services, intellectual and developmental disabilities, education and health, with agencies of such departments, or any other department or agency of state government, with private individuals and corporations, and with associations, organizations or any other entities, governmental or otherwise, for services that the department of children's services may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this title. Such services may include, but are not limited to, health, psychological, social, education, transportation, program evaluation, placement, detention, prevention, assessment and case management;

Develop and maintain a system for the purpose of handling, coordinating, processing and disseminating the information generated by the department's activities and services;

Provide appropriate training, either through the department or by contract, to individuals within the department and may provide training to those entities delivering services for the department of children's services. All child protective services workers must be trained in their legal duties to protect the constitutional and statutory rights of children and families from the initial time of contact, during the investigation, and through the treatment;

Provide for all adoption services responsibilities as it may be required to perform pursuant to title 36, chapter 1, part 1, and for the operation of the putative father registry pursuant to § 36-2-318;

Administer the Title IV-E Foster Care and Adoption Assistance Program established pursuant to the Social Security Act in 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq., or any successor entitlements;

Establish rules and regulations concerning the provision of financial assistance to persons who adopt a child who has special needs, is difficult to place because of a disability or other serious impediments to adoption;

Administer the Interstate Compact on Adoption and Medical Assistance pursuant to title 36, chapter 1, part 2;

Establish, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, rules and regulations for charging fees for the department's preparation and presentation, for any purpose, of social reports of homes or the parent or parents or other persons, when ordered by the courts unless:

The order is based upon a finding that the child or children who are the subjects of the order are victims of abuse or neglect;

The order is based upon a finding that the child or children who are the subjects of the order have been alleged in the proceedings to be victims of abuse or neglect; or

The department has received a report of harm pursuant to § 37-1-403 or § 37-1-605, concerning the child or children who are the subjects of the order. The department may, for purposes of this section, disclose such fact to the court;

Provide by rule or regulation that the parent or parents of the child or children or any person or persons legally responsible for the child or children or any other party to the case, as the court may determine, shall be assessed the costs of the social report. The costs shall not exceed the department's cost to provide the service;

Provide by rule for waiver of costs for any person or persons who are indigent, as determined by the department;

Costs of such reports shall be reported by the department to the court and such costs shall be assessed by the court as court costs, as determined by the court, against the parent or parents or other parties or person legally responsible for the child or children and such costs shall be enforced accordingly by the court;

Such costs shall be paid by the court clerk to the department, and the funds received by the department shall be deposited to the state treasury pursuant to § 9-4-301;

Establish by policy, rule or regulation appropriate and necessary guidelines for consent to health care treatment for children in state custody or who are being served by the department;

The department may acquire, hold or alienate property or leaseholds necessary or desirable for the performance of any of its functions that are vested in it by law;

The department is specifically authorized to establish any programs for the use of volunteers who may be able to provide assistance to the department in any of the services that are vested in it by law or that it may provide as a necessary part of such services. To the extent funds are available, and if necessary and desirable, the department may reimburse such volunteers for actual travel or other reasonable expenses for their services. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the provisions of the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter. Meals may be furnished without charge at department facilities if the scheduled volunteer assignment extends over an established meal period. The department may use any funds available, including federal, state or local funds or private donations, that it has for any expenses associated with these programs;

Any volunteers who are registered by the department with the board of claims shall be accorded the same protections, legal representation authorization and immunities as state employees pursuant to title 8, chapter 42, and § 9-8-307 for civil or criminal actions brought against them within the scope and course of their activities in such volunteer programs; provided, however, that they shall not be covered by workers' compensation pursuant to § 9-8-307; and

Volunteers may use state vehicles when their assignments so require, subject to the approval of the department and in compliance with any policies or rules or regulations that may be promulgated by the department;

Administer and fully implement the multi-level response system for children and families, compiled in part 6 of this chapter, including making such contracts as may be necessary to carry out the evaluations called for in that part;

Review the status of any person who has reached eighteen (18) years of age who was in the legal custody of the department and whose last commitment was based on an adjudication of dependent and neglected, unruly or in need of services pursuant to § 37-1-175, to determine if the person should receive services from the department in order to complete high school or other educational training or for the purpose of receiving other services. The department may provide services to the person who chooses to receive services from the department on a voluntary basis, subject to funding availability, budgetary constraints and compliance with department policy;

Review the status of any person who has reached nineteen (19) years of age who was in the legal custody of the department and whose last commitment was based on an adjudication of delinquency to determine if the person should receive services from the department in order to complete high school or other educational training or for the purpose of receiving other services. The department may continue to provide services to the person who chooses to receive services from the department on a voluntary basis, subject to funding availability, budgetary constraints and compliance with department policy; and

Create a safety reporting system where the department's employees may report information regarding the safety of those served by the department and the safety of the department's employees;

The identity of any individual who reports to or participates in the reporting system shall:

Be sealed from inspection by the public or any other entity or individual who is otherwise provided access to the department's confidential records under this title;

Not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil proceeding; and

Be disclosed only as necessary to carry out the purposes of the reporting system;

Any criminal act reported into the reporting system shall be disclosed by the department to the appropriate law enforcement agency or district attorney.

The attorney general and reporter shall, upon request, advise the department on matters of law.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 7; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2000, ch. 981, §§ 51, 60; 2003, ch. 355, § 24; 2004, ch. 740, § 1; 2005, ch. 391, § 12; 2008, ch. 906, § 4; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 60, 61; 2011, ch. 47, § 29; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2015, ch. 21, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

For the Preamble to the act concerning legislative intent for creation of a system for reporting safety-related information, see Acts 2015, ch. 21.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (a)(22).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 21, § 2. March 27, 2015.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. Role of DCS in the selection of an attorney under adoption assistance program. OAG 14-57, 2014 Tenn. AG Lexis 58 (5/20/14)

37-5-107. Confidentiality of records.

All applications, certificates, records, reports and all legal documents, petitions and records made or information received pursuant to this title that directly or indirectly identify a child or family receiving services from the department or that identify the person who made a report of harm pursuant to § 37-1-403 or § 37-1-605 shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed, except as provided by this section and §§ 37-1-131, 37-1-409, 37-1-612 and 49-6-3051.

The department may use or release information in the following circumstances:

The department may utilize any information it has or may acquire to provide services to the child; and

The department may release records to a person or entity that may be providing system or program evaluation.

The department shall release information in the following circumstances:

Upon request, the department shall release records to any child abuse review teams or child fatality review teams that are created or authorized by state law to review the activities of the department or to evaluate or investigate the cause of injury to or death of a child;

Records to any law enforcement agency, grand jury or court upon presentation of an appropriate court order;

Upon written request, records to any federal, state or local government entity or agent of such entity that has a need for the information in order to carry out its responsibilities under law to protect children from abuse and neglect in compliance with 42 U.S.C. § 5106a(b)(2)(B)(ix);

To provide for the public disclosure of information about any case that results in a child fatality or near fatality in compliance with 42 U.S.C. § 5106a(b)(2)(B)(x). For purposes of this subdivision (c)(4)(A), “near fatality” means a child had a serious or critical medical condition resulting from child abuse or child sexual abuse, as reported by a physician who has examined the child subsequent to the abuse;

When the department investigates a child fatality for abuse or neglect, the department shall release the following information, to the extent known, within five (5) business days of the fatality:

The child's age;

The child's gender; and

Whether the department has had history with the child.

Following the closure of an investigation for a child abuse or neglect fatality, the department shall release the final disposition of the case, whether the case meets criteria for a child death review and the full case file. The case file may be redacted to comply with the confidentiality requirements of this section.

Following the department's final classification of a child abuse or neglect near fatality, the department shall release the full case file. The case file may be redacted to comply with the confidentiality requirements of this section.

Records to any person or entity that provides system or program evaluation at the request of the department;

To the commission on children and youth any and all records requested by the commission that the commission believes necessary to perform its duties and responsibilities pursuant to § 37-3-103, particularly for the purpose of evaluating the delivery of services to children and their families served by the department; and

Upon written request, records to any person who is the subject of a report made to the department, or to the person's parent or legal guardian if the person is a minor and the parent or legal guardian is not the alleged perpetrator of or in any way responsible for the child abuse, child neglect or child sexual abuse against the child whose records are being requested. A person provided access to records pursuant to this subdivision (c)(7) shall maintain the confidentiality of the records except to the extent necessary for proper supervision, care or treatment of the subject of the report.

Pursuant to subdivision (c)(3), the department shall disclose records and information to any member of the general assembly to enable the member to determine whether the laws of this state are being complied with to protect children from abuse and neglect and whether the laws of this state need to be changed to enhance such protection; provided, that the procedures set out in subdivisions (d)(1)-(3) and any other procedures required by law are followed.

If a member of the general assembly receives a written inquiry regarding whether the laws of this state that protect children from abuse and neglect are being complied with or whether the laws of this state need to be changed to enhance protection of children, the member of the general assembly may submit a written request to the department, requesting review of the records and information relating to the inquiry. The member's request shall state the name of the child whose case file is to be reviewed and any other information that will assist the department in locating the information.

The member shall sign a form, before reviewing the records and information, that outlines the state and federal laws regarding confidentiality and the penalties for unauthorized release of the information. All records and information being reviewed by any member shall remain in the department's possession.

After reviewing the records and information, if the member requests additional information, the department shall discuss the circumstances related to the records and information being disclosed.

Any person or entity, including the commission on children and youth, that is provided access to records under this section shall be required to maintain the records in accordance with state and federal laws and regulations regarding confidentiality.

It is an offense for any person who has received or has been provided access to confidential information pursuant to this section to knowingly disclose or knowingly cause to be disclosed the information to any person or entity not otherwise provided access to the records by law.

A violation of this subsection (e) is a Class B misdemeanor.

Upon placement of a child in the custody of the department of children's services, all state, county and local agencies shall, notwithstanding any state laws or regulations to the contrary, grant access to any and all records in their possession that relate to the child for use by the department of children's services to determine a child's condition, needs, treatment or any other area of management; provided, however, that release of health care information must be consistent with the laws and policies of the departments of health, mental health and substance abuse services, and intellectual and developmental disabilities. The department of children's services shall comply with federal statutes and regulations concerning confidentiality of records. Any records that are confidential by law upon the enactment of this legislation shall be maintained as confidential by the department of children's services.

Except as otherwise provided pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1232g(b)(1), prior to the release of student records, the local education agency must give written notice to the student and parent as required by 20 U.S.C. § 1232g(b)(1), and must provide the parent with a copy of all records released.

Release of drug and alcohol records must comply with federal and state laws and regulations regarding the release of these records.

Except as provided for in subsection (c)(2), nothing in this section shall ever be construed to permit or require the department to release or disclose the identification of the person making a report of harm in accordance with § 37-1-403.

The department, in consultation with the commission on children and youth, shall adopt rules and regulations that may be necessary to establish administrative and due process procedures for the disclosure of records and other information pursuant to this section.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 8; imp. am. Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2008, ch. 1146, § 1; 2009, ch. 86, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 358, § 4; 2010, ch. 1100, § 62; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2014, ch. 771, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added (c)(4)(B)–(D).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 771, § 2. July 1, 2014.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Records of the department of children's services do not lose their character as agency records simply because they have been included in the record of a trial court proceeding and, therefore, such records remain confidential, OAG 00-128 (8/10/00).

Confidentiality of department of children's services complaints. OAG 13-93, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 108 (11/27/13).

37-5-108. Conflict of interest.

The department has the power and authority to establish by policy, rule or regulation provisions for prohibition of any conflict of interest that may occur within the department of children's services that may affect the constitutional rights of a child being served by the department of children's services. The department shall exercise this power and authority consistent with the provisions regarding conflicts of interest under title 12, chapter 4, part 1.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 9.

37-5-109. Licensing.

The responsibility for licensing children's programs, agencies, group homes, institutions or any other entity serving children that requires a license by law in Tennessee is as follows:

The department of children's services shall license or approve and supervise child abuse agencies, child caring institutions, child placing agencies, detention centers, family boarding or foster care homes, group care homes, maternity homes and temporary holding resources. Not later than January 1, 1999, the department shall develop and implement standards to ensure that children in foster care placements in public or private agencies are provided quality services that protect the safety and health of the children. Exceptions to the department's licensing responsibilities concerning the aforementioned categories are contained in § 37-5-503;

The department of human services shall license or approve and supervise child care centers, family child care homes and group child care homes. Exceptions to the department's licensing responsibilities concerning the aforementioned categories are contained in § 71-3-503;

The department of mental health and substance abuse services shall license or approve and supervise any institution, treatment resource, group residence, boarding home, sheltered workshop, activity center, rehabilitation center, hospital, community mental health center, counseling center, clinic, halfway house or other entity, by these or other names, providing mental health, intellectual disability or developmental disability services, respectively, or as required by title 33, chapter 2, part 4. Exceptions to the licensing responsibilities of the department of mental health and substance abuse services concerning the aforementioned categories are contained in § 33-2-403;

Any programs or portions of programs, or any place, home, facility, institution or other entity that is otherwise subject to licensure or approval by any other agency as required by law, shall continue to be licensed or approved by that agency unless notified to the contrary by the department of children's services; and

Subject to the exemptions set out in § 37-5-503, and pursuant to promulgated rules and regulations, the department will license or approve or supervise any entity that provides residential services to children and is not otherwise subject to licensure, approval, certification or supervision by any other agency as required by state law.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 10; 1998, ch. 1097, § 28; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 6, 8I, 8L, 8M; 2000, ch. 981, § 61; imp. am. Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 63; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

37-5-110. Contracts/Leases.

Contracts or leases entered into prior to May 21, 1996, with respect to any program or function transferred to the department of children's services with any entity, corporation, agency, enterprise or person, shall continue in full force and effect as to all essential provisions in accordance with the terms and conditions of the contracts in existence on May 21, 1996, to the same extent as if such contracts had originally been entered into by and between such entity, corporation, agency, enterprise or person and the department of children's services, unless and until such contracts or leases are amended or modified by the parties thereto or until the expiration of such contract.

This chapter shall not be implemented in any manner that violates the prohibition against impairment of contract obligations as contained in article I, § 20 of the Constitution of Tennessee.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 11.

37-5-111. Funds.

The department, through its commissioner, shall have the authority to receive, administer, allocate, disburse and supervise any grants and funds from whatever sources, including, but not limited to, the federal, state, county and municipal governments on a state, regional, county or any other basis, with respect to any programs or responsibilities outlined in this chapter or assigned to the department by law, regulation or order. Exercise of this authority shall not be inconsistent with laws or regulations governing the appropriation and disbursement of funds as administered by the department of finance and administration.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 12.

37-5-112. Rules.

All current rules, regulations, orders, decisions and policies heretofore issued or promulgated by any departments of state government whose functions have been transferred under this chapter shall remain in full force and effect and shall hereafter be administered and enforced by the department. To this end, the department of children's services, through its commissioner, shall have the authority, consistent with the statutes and regulations pertaining to the programs and functions transferred herein, to modify or rescind orders, rules and regulations, decisions or policies heretofore issued and to adopt, issue or promulgate new orders, rules and regulations, decisions or policies as may be necessary for the administration of the programs or functions herein transferred. The application of rules and regulations and the policies of the department shall be uniform and consistent throughout the state.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 13; 2009, ch. 87, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (b), concerning the implementation of rulemaking authority through promulgation of public necessity (now emergency) rules, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2001.

37-5-113. Accreditation.

The department shall have its youth development centers accredited by a regionally or nationally recognized accreditation body such as the American Correctional Association, the Council on Accreditation or other accreditation agency.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 14.

37-5-114. Transfer from department of youth development.

Any juvenile program that was administered by the department of youth development prior to May 21, 1996, shall be transferred to, and administered by, the department of children's services on and after May 21, 1996.

All staff, staff positions, offices, equipment, supplies, property, funds and other resources of any juvenile program under the department of youth development shall be transferred to the department of children's services.

References to the department of youth development or the division of juvenile probation relative to programs for juveniles appearing elsewhere in this code shall be deemed to be references to the department of children's services.

The code commission is directed to change references to the existing titles of officials, offices, agencies and entities, whenever they appear in this code, to conform to the titles of officials, offices, agencies and entities created by this chapter.

The code commission is authorized to make grammatical changes in the provisions of this code to effectuate such changes.

All contracts and leases entered into by the department of youth development relative to programs for juveniles shall continue in full force and effect as to all provisions in accordance with the terms and conditions of such contracts or leases in existence on May 21, 1996, unless and until such contracts or leases expire or are duly amended or modified by the parties thereto.

All rules, policies, orders and decisions related to juvenile services promulgated or issued by the department of youth development prior to, and in effect on May 21, 1996, shall remain in force and effect and shall be administered and enforced by the department of children's services until duly amended, repealed, expired, modified or superseded.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 15.

37-5-115. Review.

The department shall be reviewed pursuant to the requirements set out in the Tennessee Governmental Entity Review Law, compiled in title 4, chapter 29. Further, the department shall respond to requests for information from any other legislative committees including, but not limited to, the fiscal review committee, the health and welfare committee of the senate, the health committee of the house of representatives, and the government operations committees of the senate and house of representatives, to ensure that thorough review and oversight of the department is accomplished.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 183; 2013, ch. 236, § 53.

37-5-116. Non-discrimination.

No person shall, on the grounds of race, color, national origin, sex, age or ability to pay, be excluded from participation, be denied the benefits of or be otherwise subjected to discrimination under any program or activity operated by the department of children's services. This shall include, but not be limited to, contracts for services, employment or services to consumers.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 183.

37-5-117. Youth service officers — Qualifications.

After July 1, 1989, any person employed as a youth service officer by the department of children's services shall:

Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Be a citizen of the United States;

Have such person's fingerprints on file with the Tennessee bureau of investigation for criminal identification;

Have passed a physical examination by a licensed physician;

Have a good moral character as determined by investigation; and

Have been certified by a Tennessee licensed health care provider qualified in the psychiatric or psychological field as being free from any impairment, as set forth in the current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM) of the American Psychiatric Association at the time of the examination, that would, in the professional judgment of the examiner, affect the applicant's ability to perform an essential function of the job, with or without a reasonable accommodation.

Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 48; T.C.A., §4-3-2609; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 21; 2013, ch. 137, § 2.

37-5-118. Oath requirement.

All persons employed to control and manage juvenile programs for the state shall, before entering upon the discharge of their duties, take and subscribe the following oath: “I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will fully, faithfully, impartially, and diligently perform all the duties required of me as in the department of children's services, that I will execute the laws and regulations prescribed for the government of the department, so far as concerns my office; that I will accept no bribe, or other compensation during my continuance in office, other than such compensation as is allowed by law; and that I will, on no occasion, ill treat or abuse any juvenile in the care of the department.”

This oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state, and its violation by any of such officers or employees shall be perjury, punishable as in other cases of perjury.

Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 12; T.C.A., §4-3-2610; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 21.

Cross-References. Perjury, title 39, ch. 16, part 7.

37-5-119. Youth development centers — Special school district — Administration — Teachers.

The youth development centers and any other facilities deemed appropriate by the commissioner shall be a special school district, which shall be given the same funding consideration for federal funds that school districts within the state are given.

The schools within such youth development centers and any other facilities deemed appropriate by the commissioner shall be under the control of the commissioner who shall serve as the board of education and director of schools for such district.

The schools shall meet the requirements of the law for public schools and rules and regulations of the state board of education.

The commissioner of education may grant waivers for such provisions of the laws and regulations with which the schools cannot comply because of the function of the youth development centers and any other facilities deemed appropriate by the commissioner on an annual basis and in response to the commissioner's of children's services written request and justification. Such exceptions shall be in writing.

Each teacher in the special school district shall receive annual compensation at a rate of one tenth (1/10) times twelve (12) of the annual compensation in effect in the county in which the respective youth development center and any other facilities deemed appropriate by the commissioner are located or one tenth (1/10) times twelve (12) of the average of the annual compensation of all the counties that are contiguous with the county in which the respective youth development centers and any other facilities deemed appropriate by the commissioner are located, whichever is greater, solely out of the state appropriations made to the respective youth development centers and any other facilities deemed appropriate by the commissioner.

This provision shall not act to reduce the compensation currently paid any teacher in the special school district.

To the extent such resources are available, federal funding resources shall be utilized to meet increased costs resulting from implementation of this subsection (d).

Longevity shall not be paid to teachers in the special school district under the provisions of both §§ 8-23-206 and 49-5-402.

The commissioner of children's services shall develop and implement a plan whereby there shall be sufficient substitute teachers available for temporary service as needed for each school composing the special school district.

Nothing in the language of this section shall be construed as prohibiting any local school district from issuing a diploma to a resident of a youth development center and any other facilities deemed appropriate by the commissioner, upon certification of the principal of a youth center school.

School records of any juvenile in the correctional programs who is issued a diploma by a local school district shall be maintained by such local school district; provided, that all references to the juvenile's commitment to and treatment by the department of children's services are expunged.

The special school district of youth development centers and any other facilities deemed appropriate by the commissioner under the department shall have the powers, privileges and authority exercised or capable of exercise by any other school district.

The effect of this section shall not be to provide state funds to the special school district of youth development centers and any other facilities deemed appropriate by the commissioner under the department of children's services through the basic education program (BEP).

Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 9; T.C.A., §4-3-2620; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 23.

37-5-120. Library region — Creation.

There is created a library region to be composed of the youth development centers under the control of the department.

Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 10; T.C.A., §4-3-2625; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 25.